Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
ARTICLE 10
MUNICIPAL ELECTION CODE

Section

PART 1 DEFINITIONS AND
GENERAL PROVISIONS

PART 2 QUALIFICATIONS AND
REGISTRATION OF ELECTORS

PART 3 NOMINATIONS

PART 4 JUDGES

PART 5 NOTICE AND PREPARATION
FOR ELECTIONS

PART 6 CONDUCT OF ELECTIONS

PART 7 VOTING MACHINES

PART 8 ELECTRONIC SYSTEM

PART 9 PAPER BALLOTS

PART 10 ABSENTEE VOTING

PART 11 CHALLENGE OF VOTERS

PART 12 CANVASS OF VOTES

PART 13 CONTESTS

PART 14 OTHER JUDICIAL PROCEEDINGS

PART 15 ELECTION OFFENSES